Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1155
Motion; when granted; contents.

In any civil action, the district court may grant a summary jury trial upon the written motion of all parties or their oral motion in court entered upon the record. The motion for summary jury trial may contain a stipulation of the parties concerning the use or effect of the summary jury verdict.

Laws 1987, LB 225, § 2.